North Carolina statutes. Chapter 146. State Lands.
Article 10. Surveys.

§ 146-40.
Record of surveys to be kept.

The county commissioners of the several counties of the State shall provide a suitable book or books for recording of surveys of entries of land, to be known as Record of Surveys, to be kept in the office of register of deeds as other records are kept. Such record shall have an alphabetical and numerical index, the numerical index to run consecutively. It shall be the duty of every county surveyor or his deputy surveyor who makes a survey to record in such book a perfect and complete record of all surveys of lands made upon any warrant issued upon any entry, and date and sign same as of the date such survey was made.

History.

1905, c. 242; Rev., s. 1722; C.S., s. 7570; G.S., s. 146-39; 1959, c. 683, s. 1.

§ 146-41.
Former surveys recorded.

Where any ex-surveyor of a county is alive and has correct minutes or notes of surveys of land on entries made by him during his term of office, it shall be lawful for him to record and index such survey in the Record of Surveys, and the county commissioners shall pay for such services ten cents (10¢) for each survey so recorded and indexed.

History.

1905, c. 242, s. 2; Rev., s. 1725; C.S., s. 7571; G.S., s. 146-40; 1959, c. 683, s. 1.

§ 146-42.
What record must show; received as evidence.

All surveys so recorded in such book shall show the number of the tract of land, the name of the party entering, and the name of the assignee if there be any assignee; and shall be duly indexed, both alphabetically and numerically, in such record in the name of the party making the entry and in the name of the assignee if there be any assignee. Such record of any surveyor or deputy surveyor when so made shall be read in evidence in any action or proceeding in any court: Provided that if such record differs from the original certificates of survey heretofore made or on file in the office of the Secretary of State, such original or certified copy of the certificate in the Secretary of State’s office shall control.

History.

1905, c. 242, ss. 2, 3, 6; Rev., s. 1723; C.S., s. 7572; G.S., s. 146-41; 1959, c. 683, s. 1.